Nevada, session 83, SB220.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. This act may be cited as the Nevada Film
Infrastructure, Workforce Development, Education and Economic
Diversification Act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) The Las Vegas Metropolitan Area is the largest metropolitan
area in this State and has a need to improve the education and
training of the workforce in the Las Vegas Metropolitan Area and to
diversify the economy of the Area, as indicated by the impact of the
COVID-19 pandemic on the Area. The Harry Reid Research and
Technology Park has been identified as a location in the Las Vegas
Metropolitan Area for a project that can address the needs of the Las
Vegas Metropolitan Area for workforce education and training and
economic diversification.
(b) Land at the Harry Reid Research and Technology Park will
be allocated for an educational and vocational training center, to be
known as the Nevada Media and Technology Lab, which will
provide workforce development, education and economic
diversification by providing career pathways in film, video game
publishing, defense, health care and other industries identified by
the UNLV Research Foundation through the Creative Technology
Initiative at the University of Nevada, Las Vegas, and the Video
Game Publishing Design Program Initiative at the University of
Nevada, Las Vegas.
(c) Land at the Harry Reid Research and Technology Park will
also be allocated for large-scale facilities for the location of
companies that produce motion pictures and other qualified
productions in this State, which will create high-paying jobs in that
industry and diversify the economy of the Las Vegas Metropolitan
Area and this State as a whole.
(d) Because the Las Vegas Metropolitan Area and the Harry
Reid Research and Technology Park is the only area in this State
that is appropriate and suitable for the Nevada Media and
Technology Lab and the development of large-scale projects to
develop large-scale facilities for the location of companies that
produce motion pictures and other qualified productions and has all
the special attributes, conditions and resources that are essential to
support such facilities, it is necessary to enact a law of local and
special application to promote, develop and secure the advantages of
the local and special characteristics and circumstances within the
Las Vegas Metropolitan Area, which are found nowhere else in this
State, and to benefit the residents of the Las Vegas Metropolitan
Area.
-
*SB220*

– 5 –
(e) Therefore, given that a law of local and special application is
necessary to promote, develop and secure the advantages of the
local and special characteristics and circumstances within the Las
Vegas Metropolitan Area, which are found nowhere else within this
State, and given that such a law is necessary to benefit the residents
of that local and special area, a general law cannot be made
applicable to the purposes, objects, powers, rights, privileges,
immunities, liabilities, duties and disabilities set forth in the Nevada
Film Infrastructure, Workforce Development, Education and
Economic Diversification Act.
2. The Legislature further finds and declares that as a result of
the construction of large-scale facilities for the production of motion
pictures and other qualified productions in this State and the direct,
indirect and induced economic benefits of such productions in this
State, the enactment of the Act will achieve a bona fide social or
economic purpose and the economic benefits of the issuance of the
transferable tax credits to encourage the location of large-scale
facilities for the production of motion pictures and other qualified
productions in this State are expected to exceed any adverse effect
of the transferable tax credits on the revenue raised for the provision
of services to the public by the State or a local government.
Sec. 3. As used in sections 1 to 18, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
NRS 360.7581 to 360.7586, inclusive, as amended by section 19 of
this act, have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections, and
the words and terms defined in sections 4 to 9, inclusive, of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 4. “Capital investment” means all costs and expenses
incurred by the lead participant in the Nevada Studios Project only
in connection with the acquisition of land, including, without
limitation, the right to the possession of land through a ground lease,
and the design, construction, financing, installation and equipping of
the infrastructure, at the Project for the development of the Nevada
Media and Technology Lab and large-scale facilities for the location
of companies that produce qualified productions at the Project. The
amount of capital investment made in connection with the
acquisition of a right to possess land through a ground lease must be
the cost equivalent of the land.
Sec. 5. “Lead participant” means the person or entity
designated by the owner of the Nevada Studios Project as the lead
participant for the Project, or the designee or subcontractor of such a
person or entity who is authorized to operate or provide specialized
equipment, technical support or other production services at the
Project on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis.
-
*SB220*

– 6 –
Sec. 6. “Lead supplier” means the person or entity who has the
expertise, capability and resources to support the expansion and
retention of production companies who will produce qualified
productions in this State through the provision of specialized
equipment, technical support and other production services and who
is designated by the lead participant to sell or lease services or
equipment to production companies applying for film infrastructure
transferable tax credits for use in the production of qualified
productions.
Sec. 7. “Nevada Media and Technology Lab” means a site
within the Nevada Studios Project at which the University of
Nevada, Las Vegas, the College of Southern Nevada, the Nevada
State University, the Clark County School District and any other
educational organization, may offer programs of education and
vocational training that will connect the Project with organizations
in this State that provide education and vocational training for the
development of a trained workforce capable of being above-the-line
personnel and below-the-line personnel for the production of
qualified productions in this State. The educational organizations
participating in the Nevada Media and Technology Lab may
include, without limitation, universities, colleges, community
colleges, school districts, private schools, charter schools, secondary
schools, elementary schools, media-related vocational school
programs, defense industry programs, health care industry
programs, hospitality workers, veterans organizations and other
entities, organizations and persons that seek or provide vocational
training and education that will diversify the economy of this State.
Sec. 8. “Nevada Studios Project” means a real estate
development and infrastructure project undertaken by a business or
group of businesses that:
1. Is located on land at the Harry Reid Research and
Technology Park, which is owned by the University of Nevada, Las
Vegas Research Foundation and acquired by, or leased under a
ground lease to, a participant in the Project, and any land adjacent,
kitty-corner or immediately contiguous to the land that is acquired
by, or leased under a ground lease to, the lead participant in the
Project, even if such land is separated by a public street, the general
description of which is land north of West Sunset Road, west of
South Cimarron Road, south of West Patrick Lane, east of South
Durango Drive and north of West Post Road; and
2. Consists of a development that integrates at one site various
components for the production of qualified productions, including,
without limitation, film and television production studios with
multiple soundstages and support facilities and services, sites for the
-
*SB220*

– 7 –
creation of content for qualified productions and the Nevada Media
and Technology Lab.
Sec. 9. “Office” means the Office of Economic Development
within the Office of the Governor.
Sec. 10. 1. Not later than 120 days after July 1, 2025, the
Office shall enter into a development agreement with the lead
participant for the Nevada Studios Project. The development
agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, must require
the lead participant for the Project to make a total new capital
investment in this State of:
(1) At least $150,000,000 by December 31, 2028; and
(2) At least a cumulative total, including the amount
described in subparagraph (1), of $300,000,000 by December 31,
2029;
(b) Must establish the minimum number of soundstages at the
Project to be used for the various components of the production of
qualified productions and require the Project to include the Nevada
Media and Technology Lab;
(c) May include such other provisions, not inconsistent with
law, to carry out the provisions of the Act concerning the
development of the Project and the issuance of film infrastructure
transferable tax credits pursuant to sections 1 to 18, inclusive, of this
act, as agreed to by the Office and the lead participant; and
(d) Must not include any requirements for the development of
the Project, other than the requirements set forth in paragraphs (a)
and (b) or any requirements to qualify for the issuance of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits.
2. As the Executive Director of the Office deems necessary or
advisable, the Executive Director may modify the requirements of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 only by extending the date by which
the capital investment required by that paragraph must be made.
3. The Office shall not approve any abatement, partial
abatement or exemption from taxes or any other incentive for
economic development, other than film infrastructure transferable
tax credits pursuant to sections 1 to 18, inclusive, of this act or
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to NRS 360.758
to 360.7598, inclusive, for the Nevada Studios Project if the lead
participant has entered into a development agreement with the
Office pursuant to this section.
Sec. 11. A production company must obtain the written
approval of the lead participant before submitting an application for
film infrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to section 12 of
this act. Not later than 10 business days after receiving from a
production company a written request for approval to apply for film
-
*SB220*

– 8 –
infrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to section 12 of this
act, the lead participant shall approve or deny the request and notify
the production company, in writing, of the approval or denial of the
request.
Sec. 12. 1. Beginning on the date on which the lead
participant executes a development agreement pursuant to section
10 of this act, a production company that produces, in whole or in
part, a qualified production in this State, may apply to the Office for
a certificate of eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits for any qualified direct production expenditures. The film
infrastructure transferable tax credits may be applied to:
(a) Any tax imposed by chapters 363A and 363B of NRS;
(b) The gaming license fees imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(c) Any tax imposed by chapter 680B of NRS; or
(d) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
2. Except as otherwise provided in section 15 of this act, the
Executive Director of the Office shall approve an application for a
certificate of eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits if the Office finds that the production company qualifies for
the film infrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to subsection
3. If the Office approves an application for a certificate of eligibility
for film infrastructure transferable tax credits, the Office shall
calculate the estimated amount of film infrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to sections 14 and 15 of this act.
3. To be eligible for film infrastructure transferable tax credits
pursuant to this section, the production company must:
(a) Submit an application that meets the requirements of
subsection 4;
(b) Submit to the Office the written approval from the lead
participant stating that the lead participant has approved the
production company to apply for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits for the qualified production for which the application is
submitted;
(c) Provide proof to the Office that 70 percent or more of the
funding for the qualified production has been obtained;
(d) Provide proof to the Office that:
(1) At least 50 percent of the total number of days of
principal photography on which a stage is used, and at least 30
percent of the total number of days of second-unit filming on which
a stage is used, will occur at the Nevada Studios Project; or
(2) At least $500,000 of qualified direct production
expenditures will be incurred at the site of the Project;
(e) Provide proof to the Office that:
-
*SB220*

– 9 –
(1) The production company has in place a diversity plan for
hiring minority persons and women in all areas of the production of
the qualified production, including, without limitation, production
crew and staff, entry-level positions, management positions and
talent-related positions, and for using vendors that are minority-
owned business enterprises or women-owned business enterprises;
(2) The diversity plan establishes goals for hiring persons,
and using vendors, that reflect the racial and gender demographics
of this State and that are stated in terms of wages paid to minority
persons and women and prices paid to vendors that are minority-
owned business enterprises or women-owned business enterprises;
and
(3) The diversity plan describes strategies that the applicant
will use to achieve the goals established in the diversity plan, which
may include, without limitation, the participation of the production
company in programs of training, education and recruitment that are
organized in cooperation with public colleges and universities in this
State, labor organizations and the motion picture industry and that
are designed to promote and encourage the training and hiring of
residents of this State who represent the diversity of the population
of this State; and
(4) The diversity plan indicates actions that the production
company will take to ensure equal opportunities for minority
persons and women in recruitment, selection, appointment,
promotion, training and other related aspects of employment, which
may include, without limitation, advertising, recruitment and
opportunities for internships;
(f) Not later than 270 days after the completion of principal
photography of the qualified production or, if any direct production
expenditures for postproduction will be incurred in this State, not
later than 270 days after the completion of postproduction, unless
the Office agrees to extend this period by not more than 90 days,
provide the Office with:
(1) A report on the extent to which the applicant has met the
diversity goals established in the diversity plan described in
paragraph (e); and
(2) An audit of the qualified production that is performed by
an independent certified public accountant in this State who is
approved by the Office and that includes an itemized report of
qualified direct production expenditures and that shows that the
qualified production satisfied the requirements of paragraph (d);
(g) Pay the cost of the audit required by subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (f);
(h) Enter into a written agreement with the Office that requires
the production company, except when prohibited by law or when the
-
*SB220*

– 10 –
qualified production for which film infrastructure transferable tax
credits are issued is not distributed, to include:
(1) An on-screen acknowledgment of the State of Nevada
and the Nevada Studios Project, the language of which may be
chosen by the applicant if the language is approved by the Office; or
(2) If the qualified production does not have end screen
credits, an acknowledgment of the State of Nevada and the Nevada
Studios Project, which is approved by the Office and the production
company, in the final version of the qualified production; and
(i) Enter into an agreement with the Office that requires the
production company to provide to each loan-out company engaged
by the production company to provide services in this State in
connection with the qualified production a notice stating:
(1) That this State imposes a tax pursuant to chapters 363A
and 363B of NRS on the wages paid by certain employers and a
commerce tax pursuant to chapter 363C of NRS on business entities
engaging in business in this State; and
(2) Instructions for obtaining additional information from the
Department of Taxation regarding the imposition, collection and
remittance of those taxes.
4. An application submitted pursuant to subsection 3 must
contain:
(a) A script, storyboard or synopsis of the qualified production;
(b) The names of the production company and, if known, the
proposed producer, director and cast;
(c) An estimated timeline to complete the qualified production;
(d) A summary of the budgeted expenditures for the entire
production, including projected expenditures to be incurred outside
of Nevada, for the period beginning not earlier than 90 days before
the submission of the application through the completion of
postproduction;
(e) Details regarding the financing of the qualified production,
including, without limitation, any information relating to a binding
financing commitment, loan application, commitment letter or
investment letter;
(f) An acknowledgment that the application and any
documentation submitted to the Office in relation to the application
are public records unless the Office approves a request submitted by
the production company pursuant to NRS 231.069 to keep
confidential the application and any information submitted in
relation to the application;
(g) An affirmation that, before beginning the production of the
qualified production, the production company will obtain a policy of
general liability insurance in an amount of at least $1,000,000 and
will provide satisfactory proof of such a policy to the Office;
-
*SB220*

– 11 –
(h) The business address of the production company;
(i) The diversity plan of the production company, which must be
submitted to the Office not later than 14 days before the
commencement of principal photography in this State, unless
otherwise approved in writing by the Office;
(j) The written approval of the lead participant for the
production company to be issued film infrastructure transferable tax
credits for the qualified production for which the application is
submitted;
(k) Proof that the qualified production meets any applicable
requirements relating to workers’ compensation insurance before
beginning production of the qualified production; and
(l) Proof that the production company has secured all licenses
and registrations required to do business in each location in this
State at which the qualified production will be produced.
5. If the Office approves an application for a certificate of
eligibility for film infrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to
this section, the Office shall immediately forward a copy of the
certificate of eligibility which identifies the estimated amount of tax
credits available pursuant to section 14 of this act to:
(a) The applicant;
(b) The lead participant;
(c) The Department of Taxation; and
(d) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
6. Within 45 business days after receipt of an audit provided by
a production company pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph (f)
of subsection 3 and any other accountings or other information
required by the Office, the Office shall determine whether to certify
the audit and make a final determination of whether a certificate of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits will be issued. If the
Office certifies the audit, determines that all other requirements for
the film infrastructure transferable tax credits have been met and
determines that a certificate of film infrastructure transferable tax
credits will be issued, the Office shall notify the production
company that the film infrastructure transferable tax credits will be
issued. Within 30 days after the receipt of the notice, the production
company shall make an irrevocable declaration of the amount of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits that will be applied to
each fee or tax set forth in subsection 1, thereby accounting for all
of the credits which will be issued. Upon receipt of the declaration,
the Office shall issue to the production company a certificate of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits in the amount approved by
the Office for the fees or taxes included in the declaration of the
production company. The production company shall notify the
Office upon transferring any of the film infrastructure transferable
-
*SB220*

– 12 –
tax credits. The Office shall notify the Department of Taxation and
the Nevada Gaming Control Board of all film infrastructure
transferable tax credits issued, segregated by each fee or tax set
forth in subsection 1, and the amount of any film infrastructure
transferable tax credits transferred.
7. Within 30 days after the issuance of a certificate of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to subsection 6, the
production company shall pay to the Office an amount of money
equal to 10 percent of the amount of film infrastructure transferable
tax credits issued to the production company pursuant to subsection
6. The Office shall deposit any money received pursuant to this
subsection with the State Treasurer for credit to the Account for
Nevada Film, Media and Related Technology Education and
Vocational Training created by section 30 of this act. A payment
made pursuant to this subsection shall be deemed to be a payment
made from film infrastructure transferable tax credits which would
have been authorized and approved for the production company if a
payment pursuant to this subsection were not required.
8. An applicant for film infrastructure transferable tax credits
pursuant to this section shall, upon the request of the Executive
Director of the Office, furnish the Executive Director with copies of
all records necessary to verify that the applicant meets the
requirements of subsection 3.
9. The Office:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing:
(1) Any additional qualified expenditures or production costs
that may serve as the basis for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to section 13 of this act;
(2) The application review process;
(3) That a qualified production for which records are
required to be maintained by 18 U.S.C. § 2257, with respect to any
performer in such qualified production engaging in sexually explicit
conduct, is not eligible for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits;
(4) The requirements for providing notice pursuant to section
16 of this act that information is incomplete; and
(5) Any necessary provisions to ensure compliance with the
requirements of paragraph (e) of subsection 3 relating to diversity
plans and that are necessary to require that the diversity plan of an
applicant reflects the racial and gender diversity of this State.
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary to ensure
that the provisions of sections 1 to 18, inclusive, of this act are
carried out in a manner that is reasonable and customary within the
industry for the production of qualified productions.
-
*SB220*

– 13 –
10. The Nevada Tax Commission and the Nevada Gaming
Commission:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing the manner in which film
infrastructure transferable tax credits will be administered.
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary to carry
out the provisions of sections 1 to 18, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 13. 1. Qualified direct production expenditures must be
for purchases, rentals or leases of tangible personal property or
services from a Nevada business during the period in which a
qualified production is produced, must be customary and reasonable
and must relate to:
(a) Set construction and operation;
(b) Wardrobe and makeup;
(c) Photography, sound and lighting;
(d) Filming, film processing and film editing;
(e) The rental or leasing of facilities, locations, equipment and
vehicles;
(f) Food, lodging and transportation, including, without
limitation, airfares for flights to or from this State that are purchased
through a Nevada business;
(g) Editing, sound mixing, special effects, visual effects and
other postproduction services;
(h) The payroll for Nevada residents or other personnel who
provided services in this State, whether as above-the-line personnel
or below-the-line personnel, including, without limitation, wages,
fringe benefits and living expenses paid in connection with services
rendered in this State;
(i) Payments for goods or services provided by a Nevada
business or the lead supplier;
(j) The design, construction, improvement or repair of property,
infrastructure, equipment or a production or postproduction facility;
(k) Charges for services that are necessary to complete a sale,
lease or rental of any tangible personal property described in this
subsection, to the extent not included as part of another cost
reported pursuant to this section;
(l) State and local government taxes to the extent not included as
part of another cost reported pursuant to this section; and
(m) Any other transaction, service or activity authorized in
regulations adopted by the Office pursuant to section 12 of this act.
2. In addition to the qualified direct production expenditures
listed in subsection 1, payments to a qualified entity for services
performed in Nevada by a qualified individual are qualified direct
production expenditures.
3. Expenditures and costs:
(a) Related to:
-
*SB220*

– 14 –
(1) The acquisition, transfer or use of film infrastructure
transferable tax credits;
(2) Marketing and distribution;
(3) Financing, depreciation and amortization;
(4) The payment of any profits as a result of the qualified
production;
(5) The payment for the cost of the audit required by
subparagraph (2) of paragraph (f) of section 12 of this act; and
(6) The payment for any goods or services that are not
directly attributable to the qualified production;
(b) For which reimbursement is received, or for which
reimbursement is reasonably expected to be received;
(c) Which are paid to a joint venturer or a parent, subsidiary or
other affiliate of the production company, unless the amount paid
represents the fair market value of the purchase, rental or lease of
the property or services for which payment is made, which may be
established by considering the amount paid for the purchase, rental
or lease of comparable property or services from the joint venturer,
parent, subsidiary or other affiliate by a person, other than the
production company, in another state or country;
(d) Which are paid to another person for the purpose of
subcontracting or passing through any purchase, rental or lease of
tangible personal property or services used or consumed for the
qualified production; or
(e) Which have been previously claimed as a basis for film
infrastructure transferable tax credits or noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits,
 are not qualified direct production expenditures and are not
eligible to serve as a basis for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits issued pursuant to section 12 of this act.
4. If any tangible personal property is acquired by a Nevada
business, other than the lead supplier, from a vendor outside this
State for immediate resale, rental or lease to a production company
that produces a qualified production, expenditures incurred by the
production company for the purchase, rental or lease of the property
are qualified direct production expenditures if:
(a) The Nevada business regularly deals in property of that kind;
and
(b) The expenditures are otherwise qualified direct production
expenditures under the provisions of this section.
5. If any tangible personal property is acquired by the
production company as an asset, the calculation of the costs of the
tangible personal property that constitute a qualified direct
production expenditure must be performed in the manner prescribed
by the Office by regulation.
-
*SB220*

– 15 –
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Fringe benefits” means employee expenses paid by an
employer for the use of a person’s services, including, without
limitation, payments made to a governmental entity, union dues,
health insurance premiums, payments to a pension plan and
payments for workers’ compensation insurance.
(b) “Nevada business” means a business that is registered with
the Secretary of State to do business in this State and has an ongoing
physical presence in this State, which must be evidenced by a
business address in the name of the business that is located in this
State and that is not a post office box.
(c) “Qualified entity” means a payroll services corporation or
loan-out company:
(1) That is a corporation organized pursuant to chapter 78 of
NRS, a foreign corporation required to file an initial or annual list
with the Secretary of State pursuant to chapter 80 of NRS, a limited-
liability company organized pursuant to chapter 86 of NRS or a
foreign limited-liability company registered with the Secretary of
State pursuant to chapter 86 of NRS;
(2) That receives payment for services performed by a
qualified individual who would otherwise be directly employed by
the production company producing a qualified production; and
(3) Of which at least 50 percent of the ownership interest is
owned directly or indirectly by the qualified individual performing
services for the qualified production.
(d) “Qualified individual” means a natural person who performs
services during the production period in an activity related to the
production of a qualified production, including, without limitation,
the preproduction, production and postproduction phases of the
production of a qualified production. The term does not include:
(1) A natural person related, in any manner set forth in 26
U.S.C. § 51(i)(1)(A), (B) or (C), to the production company or an
employee of the production company; or
(2) Any 5-percent owner, as defined in 26 U.S.C. §
416(i)(1)(B)(i), of the production company.
Sec. 14. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2
and 4 and section 15 of this act, the base amount of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits issued to an eligible
production company pursuant to section 12 of this act must equal:
(a) Thirty-five percent of the qualified direct production
expenditures paid to Nevada residents in connection with services
rendered in this State, including, without limitation, fringe benefits,
as defined in section 13 of this act, and handling fees paid to such
persons.
-
*SB220*

– 16 –
(b) Thirty percent of the qualified direct production expenditures
other than the qualified direct production expenditures described in
paragraph (a).
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4 and
section 15 of this act, for an application for a certificate of eligibility
for film infrastructure transferable tax credits approved by the
Office:
(a) Not less than 60 months, but less than 85 months, after the
date on which the development agreement was executed pursuant to
section 10 of this act, the base amount of film infrastructure
transferable tax credits calculated pursuant to subsection 1 must be
reduced by 5 percent of the amount of film infrastructure
transferable tax credits that would otherwise be issued, if less than
40 percent of the below-the-line personnel of the qualified
production are Nevada residents.
(b) Eighty-five months or more after the date on which the
development agreement was executed pursuant to section 10 of this
act, the base amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
calculated pursuant to subsection 1 must be reduced by 10 percent
of the amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits that
would otherwise be issued, if less than 60 percent of the below-the-
line personnel of the qualified production are Nevada residents.
 A reduction in the amount of film infrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to this subsection must not reduce the amount of
money paid pursuant to subsection 7 of section 12 of this act to the
Account for Nevada Film, Media and Related Technology
Education and Vocational Training created by section 30 of this act.
3. For the purposes of subsection 2:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), the
percentage of the below-the-line personnel who are Nevada
residents must be determined by dividing the number of workdays
worked by Nevada residents by the number of workdays worked by
all below-the-line personnel.
(b) Any work performed by an extra must not be considered in
determining the percentage of the below-the-line personnel who are
Nevada residents.
4. The Office may:
(a) Reduce the cumulative amount of film infrastructure
transferable tax credits that are calculated pursuant to this section by
an amount equal to any damages incurred by the State or any
political subdivision of the State as a result of a qualified production
that is produced in this State; or
(b) Withhold the film infrastructure transferable tax credits, in
whole or in part:
-
*SB220*

– 17 –
(1) Until any pending legal action in this State against a
production company or involving a qualified production is resolved.
(2) If a production company violates any state or local law.
(3) If a production company is found to have knowingly
submitted any false statement, representation or certification in any
document submitted for the purpose of obtaining film infrastructure
transferable tax credits.
5. For an employee to be considered a resident of Nevada for
the purposes of this section, the production company must maintain
the following documents in the personnel file of the employee:
(a) A statement signed by the employee that the employee:
(1) Was a bona-fide resident of this State for at least 120
days before the commencement of the period during which the
employee renders services for the production of the qualified
production; and
(2) Has been a bona-fide resident of this State continuously
throughout the period during which the employee renders services
for the production of the qualified production;
(b) A copy of the current and valid Nevada driver’s license of
the employee or a current and valid identification card for the
employee issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles and, if
applicable, a copy of the most recently expired Nevada driver’s
license of the employee or the most recently expired identification
card for the employee issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
and
(c) A copy of a utility bill containing the name of the employee
or a copy of a voter registration card issued to the employee.
 The production company shall maintain the documentation
required by this subsection in the personnel file of the employee
until the Office makes a final determination concerning the issuance
of film infrastructure transferable tax credits for the qualified
production on which the employee rendered services and shall, upon
request, make the documentation available to the Office or any
person performing the audit of the qualified production as required
by subparagraph (2) of paragraph (f) of subsection 3 of section 12 of
this act.
Sec. 15. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Executive Director of the Office shall not approve any application
for film infrastructure transferable tax credits submitted pursuant to
section 12 of this act if:
(a) Approval of the application would cause the total amount of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits approved pursuant to
section 12 of this act:
(1) To exceed $48,000,000 during the first 12-month period
of the development period.
-
*SB220*

– 18 –
(2) To exceed $48,000,000 during the second 12-month
period of the development period.
(3) To exceed $63,000,000 during the third 12-month period
of the development period.
(4) To exceed $58,100,000 for each fiscal year commencing
after:
(I) The end of the development period; and
(II) The lead participant has made the capital investment
required pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a) of subsection
1 of section 10 of this act but before the lead participant has made
the capital investment required pursuant to subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of section 10 of this act.
(5) To exceed $83,000,000 for each fiscal year commencing
after:
(I) The end of the development period; and
(II) The lead participant has made the capital investment
required pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph (a) of subsection
1 of section 10 of this act.
(b) The application is submitted by a production company in a
fiscal year that begins more than 15 years after the Nevada Studios
Project receives its first certificate of occupancy.
2. If a production company satisfies all requirements for the
approval of an application for film infrastructure transferable tax
credits and the approval of the application would cause the total
amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits approved
during the current fiscal year to exceed the amount authorized to be
approved for the current fiscal year, the Executive Director of the
Office shall approve the application and reduce the amount of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits authorized to be approved
pursuant to subsection 1 in the next fiscal year by the amount of film
infrastructure transferable tax credits approved during the current
fiscal year in excess of the amount authorized to be approved during
the current fiscal year. Any film infrastructure transferable tax
credits approved during the development period in excess of the
amount authorized by subsection 1 to be approved during the
development period may not be taken against any allowable fee or
tax before the first fiscal year after the end of the development
period.
3. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of subsection
1, 50 percent of the amount of film infrastructure transferable tax
credits authorized for the development period and any fiscal year
beginning after the end of the development period that are not
approved for the development period or the fiscal year, as
applicable, may be carried forward and made available for approval:
-
*SB220*

– 19 –
(a) If the credits being carried forward are authorized to be
approved during the development period, for the first fiscal year
beginning after the end of the development period.
(b) If the credits being carried forward are authorized to be
approved for a fiscal year beginning after the end of the
development period, for the next fiscal year.
 For any fiscal year to which film infrastructure transferable tax
credits are carried forward from the immediately preceding fiscal
year pursuant to this subsection, the film infrastructure transferable
tax credits that have been carried forward must be deemed to be the
first film infrastructure transferable tax credits issued until the total
amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits from the
immediately preceding fiscal year have been issued.
4. If the Executive Director of the Office approves an
application for a certificate of eligibility pursuant to section 12 of
this act, the amount of any film infrastructure transferable tax credits
that:
(a) For any reason, are not issued to the production company
that submitted the application must be considered to be unused and
available to be used or carried forward in the manner set forth in this
section.
(b) Are issued but unused, as evidenced by the return to the
Office of the certificate of film infrastructure transferable tax
credits, must be considered to be unused and available to be used or
carried forward in the manner set forth in this section.
5. Film infrastructure transferable tax credits issued to a
production company for a qualified production pursuant to section
12 of this act expire at the end of the fiscal year that is 7 years after
the date on which the film infrastructure transferable tax credits are
issued to the production company.
6. For the purposes of this section, the “development period” is
the period beginning on the date on which the Office and the lead
participant execute a development agreement pursuant to section 10
of this act and ending 36 months after that date.
Sec. 16. 1. Except as otherwise provided in sections 3 to 18,
inclusive, of this act, the Executive Director of the Office shall
approve an application for film infrastructure transferable tax credits
submitted pursuant to section 12 of this act if the Executive Director
determines that the applicant satisfies the criteria for the issuance of
film infrastructure transferable tax credits.
2. A production company that produces a qualified production
shall submit the audit required by subparagraph (2) of paragraph (f)
of subsection 3 of section 12 of this act and all other required
information to the Office and the Department of Taxation within the
time required by paragraph (f) of subsection 3 of section 12 of this
-
*SB220*

– 20 –
act. If the Office or the Department determines that information
submitted pursuant to this subsection is incomplete, the production
company shall, not later than 30 days after receiving notice that the
information is incomplete, provide to the Office or the Department,
as applicable, all additional information required by the Office or
the Department.
Sec. 17. 1. A production company that is found to have
knowingly submitted any false statement, representation or
certification in any document submitted for the purpose of obtaining
film infrastructure transferable tax credits or who otherwise
becomes ineligible for film infrastructure transferable tax credits
after receiving the film infrastructure transferable tax credits
pursuant to section 12 of this act shall repay to the Department of
Taxation or the Nevada Gaming Control Board, as applicable, any
portion of the film infrastructure transferable tax credits to which
the production company is not entitled.
2. Film infrastructure transferable tax credits purchased in
good faith are not subject to forfeiture or repayment by the
transferee unless the transferee submitted fraudulent information in
connection with the purchase.
Sec. 18. The Office shall, on or before October 1 of each year,
prepare and submit to the Governor and to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature an
annual report which includes, for the immediately preceding fiscal
year:
1. The number of applications submitted for film infrastructure
transferable tax credits pursuant to section 12 of this act;
2. The number of qualified productions for which film
infrastructure transferable tax credits were approved;
3. The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
approved;
4. The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
used;
5. The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
transferred;
6. The amount of film infrastructure transferable tax credits
taken against each allowable fee or tax, including the actual amount
used and outstanding, in total and for each qualified production;
7. The total amount of the qualified direct production
expenditures incurred by each qualified production and the portion
of those expenditures that were incurred in Nevada;
8. The number of persons in Nevada employed by each
qualified production, the amount of wages paid to those persons and
any demographic information concerning those persons that has
been voluntarily provided by those persons;
-
*SB220*

– 21 –
9. The period during which each qualified production was in
Nevada and employed persons in Nevada;
10. The number of qualified productions produced by persons
affiliated with the Nevada Studios Project and the number of
qualified productions that were produced by persons not affiliated
with the Project;
11. Demographic information concerning persons who
participate in a program of vocational training and education offered
at the Nevada Media and Technology Lab that is voluntarily
provided by those persons; and
12. Recommendations for improving the operation of the
program for the issuance of film infrastructure transferable tax
credits, including, without limitation, methods to promote and
encourage the development and establishment of production
companies in this State that are either affiliated with the Nevada
Studios Project or not affiliated with the Project.
Sec. 19. NRS 360.7586 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7586 1. “Qualified production” includes preproduction,
production and postproduction and means:
(a) A theatrical, direct-to-video or other media motion picture.
(b) A made-for-television motion picture.
(c) Visual effects or digital animation sequences.
(d) A television pilot program.
(e) A television, Internet or other media series, including,
without limitation, a comedy, drama, miniseries, soap opera, talk
show, game show or telenovela, or an episode of such a series.
(f) A reality show.
(g) A national or regional commercial or series of commercials.
(h) An infomercial.
(i) A music video.
(j) A documentary film or series.
(k) Other visual media productions, including, without
limitation, digital media, video games and mobile applications.
2. The term does not include:
(a) A news, weather or current events program.
(b) A production that is primarily produced for industrial,
corporate or institutional use.
(c) A telethon or any production that solicits money, other than a
production which is produced for national distribution.
(d) A political advertisement.
(e) A sporting event, including, without limitation, a sportscast,
preshow, postshow or sports newscast related to a sporting event. A
qualified production described by subsection 1 shall not be deemed
a sporting event for the purposes of this paragraph for the sole
reason that it features athletes or relates to sports.
-
*SB220*

– 22 –
(f) A gala, pageant or awards show.
(g) Any type of media production created solely for the purpose
of posting the production on social media.
(h) Any other type of production that is excluded by regulations
adopted by the Office of Economic Development pursuant to
NRS 360.759.
Sec. 20. NRS 360.759 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.759 1. A production company that produces a qualified
production in this State in whole or in part may apply to the Office
of Economic Development for a certificate of eligibility for
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits for any qualified direct
production expenditures. The noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits may be applied to:
(a) Any tax imposed by chapters 363A and 363B of NRS;
(b) The gaming license fees imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(c) Any tax imposed pursuant to chapter 680B of NRS; or
(d) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
2. The Office may approve an application for a certificate of
eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits if the Office
finds that the production company producing the qualified
production qualifies for the noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits pursuant to subsection 3. If the Office approves the
application, the Office shall calculate the estimated amount of the
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to NRS
360.7592, 360.7593 and 360.7594.
3. To be eligible for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
pursuant to this section, a production company must:
(a) Submit an application that meets the requirements of
subsection 4;
(b) Provide [proof satisfactory to the Office that the qualified
production is in the economic interest of the State;
(c) Provide] proof [satisfactory] to the Office that 70 percent or
more of the funding for the qualified production has been obtained;
[(d)] (c) Provide proof [satisfactory] to the Office that at least
60 percent of the direct production expenditures for:
(1) Preproduction;
(2) Production; and
(3) If any direct production expenditures for postproduction
will be incurred in this State, postproduction,
 of the qualified production will be incurred in this State as
qualified direct production expenditures;
[(e)] (d) Not later than 270 days after the completion of
principal photography of the qualified production or, if any direct
-
*SB220*

– 23 –
production expenditures for postproduction will be incurred in this
State, not later than 270 days after the completion of postproduction,
unless the Office agrees to extend this period by not more than 90
days, provide the Office with an audit of the qualified production
that includes an itemized report of qualified direct production
expenditures which:
(1) Shows that the qualified production incurred qualified
direct production expenditures of $500,000 or more; and
(2) Is certified by an independent certified public accountant
in this State who is approved by the Office;
[(f)] (e) Pay the cost of the audit required by paragraph [(e);]
(d); and
[(g)] (f) Enter into a written agreement with the Office that
requires the production company to include:
(1) In the end screen credits of the qualified production [, a] :
(I) A logo of this State provided by the Office which
indicates that the qualified production was filmed or otherwise
produced in Nevada; and
(II) If the qualified production was produced at the
Nevada Studios Project, an acknowledgment of the Project; or
(2) If the qualified production does not have end screen
credits, another acknowledgment in the final version of the qualified
production which indicates that the qualified production was
[filmed] :
(I) Filmed or otherwise produced in Nevada; and
[(h) Meet any other requirements prescribed by regulation
pursuant to this section.]
(II) Produced at the Nevada Studios Project, if
applicable.
4. An application submitted pursuant to subsection 3 must
contain:
(a) A script, storyboard or synopsis of the qualified production;
(b) The names of the production company, producer, director
and proposed cast;
(c) An estimated timeline to complete the qualified production;
(d) A summary of the budgeted expenditures for the entire
production, including projected expenditures to be incurred outside
of Nevada;
(e) Details regarding the financing of the project, including,
without limitation, any information relating to a binding financing
commitment, loan application, commitment letter or investment
letter;
(f) An insurance certificate, binder or quote for general liability
insurance of $1,000,000 or more;
(g) The business address of the production company;
-
*SB220*

– 24 –
(h) Proof that the qualified production meets any applicable
requirements relating to workers’ compensation insurance; and
(i) Proof that the production company has secured all licenses
and registrations required to do business in each location in this
State at which the qualified production will be produced . [; and
(j) Any other information required by regulations adopted by the
Office pursuant to subsection 8.]
5. If the Office approves an application for a certificate of
eligibility for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to
this section, the Office shall immediately forward a copy of the
certificate of eligibility which identifies the estimated amount of the
tax credits available pursuant to NRS 360.7592 to:
(a) The applicant;
(b) The Department; and
(c) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
6. Within 60 business days after receipt of an audit provided by
a production company pursuant to paragraph [(e)] (d) of subsection
3 and any other accountings or other information required by the
Office, the Office shall determine whether to certify the audit and
make a final determination of whether a certificate of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits will be issued. If the
Office certifies the audit, determines that all other requirements for
the noninfrastructure transferable tax credits have been met and
determines that a certificate of noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits will be issued, the Office shall notify the production
company that the noninfrastructure transferable tax credits will be
issued. Within 30 days after the receipt of the notice, the production
company shall make an irrevocable declaration of the amount of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits that will be applied to
each fee or tax set forth in subsection 1, thereby accounting for all
of the credits which will be issued. Upon receipt of the declaration,
the Office shall issue to the production company a certificate of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits in the amount approved
by the Office for the fees or taxes included in the declaration of the
production company. The production company shall notify the
Office upon transferring any of the noninfrastructure transferable
tax credits. The Office shall notify the Department and the Nevada
Gaming Control Board of all noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits issued, segregated by each fee or tax set forth in subsection
1, and the amount of any noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
transferred.
7. Within 30 days after the issuance of a certificate of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to subsection
6, if the application for the noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits was submitted on or after July 1, 2025, and before July 1,
-
*SB220*

– 25 –
2043, the production company shall pay to the Office an amount
of money equal to 10 percent of the amount of noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits issued to the production company
pursuant to subsection 6. The Office shall deposit any money
received pursuant to this subsection with the State Treasurer for
credit to the Account for Nevada Film, Media and Related
Technology Education and Vocational Training created by section
30 of this act. A payment made pursuant to this subsection shall be
deemed to be a payment made from noninfrastructure transferable
tax credits which would have been authorized and approved for
the production company if a payment pursuant to this subsection
were not required.
8. An applicant for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
pursuant to this section shall, upon the request of the Executive
Director of the Office, furnish the Executive Director with copies of
all records necessary to verify that the applicant meets the
requirements of subsection 3.
[8.] 9. The Office:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing:
(1) [Any additional requirements to receive transferable tax
credits;
(2)] Any additional qualified expenditures or production
costs that may serve as the basis for noninfrastructure transferable
tax credits pursuant to NRS 360.7591;
[(3) Any additional information that must be included with
an application pursuant to subsection 4;
(4)] (2) The application review process;
[(5) Any type of]
(3) That a qualified production [which, due to obscene or
sexually explicit material,] for which records are required to be
maintained by 18 U.S.C. § 2257, with respect to any performer in
such qualified production engaging in sexually explicit conduct, is
not eligible for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits; and
[(6)] (4) The requirements for notice pursuant to NRS
360.7595; and
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary to [carry
out] ensure that the provisions of NRS 360.758 to 360.7598,
inclusive [.
9.] , are carried out in a manner that is reasonable and
customary within the industry for the production of qualified
productions.
10. The Nevada Tax Commission and the Nevada Gaming
Commission:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing the manner in which
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits will be administered.
-
*SB220*

– 26 –
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary to carry
out the provisions of NRS 360.758 to 360.7598, inclusive.
11. As used in this section, “Nevada Studios Project” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 8 of this act.
Sec. 21. NRS 360.7592 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7592 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [4] 5
and NRS 360.7593 and 360.7594, the base amount of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued to an eligible
production company pursuant to NRS 360.759 :
(a) For an eligible production company that submitted the
application for the certificate of eligibility for the
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits before July 1, 2025, or
on or after July 1, 2043, must equal 15 percent of the qualified
direct production expenditures.
(b) For an eligible production company that submitted the
application for the certificate of eligibility for the
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits on or after July 1, 2025,
and before July 1, 2043, must equal:
(1) Thirty-five percent of the qualified direct production
expenditures paid to Nevada residents in connection with services
rendered in this State, including, without limitation, fringe
benefits, as defined in NRS 360.7593, and handling fees paid to
such persons.
(2) Thirty percent of the qualified direct production
expenditures other than the qualified direct production
expenditures described in subparagraph (1).
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections [3] 4 and [4] 5
and NRS 360.7594, if the eligible production company submitted
the application for the certificate of eligibility for
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits pursuant to NRS
360.759 before July 1, 2025, or on or after July 1, 2043, in addition
to the base amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1, noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued to an
eligible production company [pursuant to NRS 360.759] must
include credits in an amount equal to:
(a) An additional 5 percent of the qualified direct production
expenditures if more than 50 percent of the below-the-line personnel
of the qualified production are Nevada residents; and
(b) An additional 5 percent of the qualified direct production
expenditures if more than 50 percent of the filming days of the
qualified production occurred in a county in this State in which, in
each of the 2 years immediately preceding the date of application,
qualified productions incurred less than $10,000,000 of qualified
direct production expenditures.
-
*SB220*

– 27 –
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5 and
NRS 360.7594, if the eligible production company submitted the
application for the certificate of eligibility for noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits pursuant to NRS 360.759 on or after
July 1, 2025, and before July 1, 2043, the base amount of
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits calculated pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 must be reduced by 2 percent of the
qualified direct production expenditures if less than 50 percent of
the below-the-line personnel of the qualified production are
Nevada residents. A reduction in the amount of noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits pursuant to this subsection must not
reduce the amount of money transferred pursuant to subsection 7
of NRS 360.759 to the Account for Nevada Film, Media and
Related Technology Education and Vocational Training created
by section 30 of this act.
4. For the purposes of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 [:] and
subsection 3:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, the percentage of the below-the-line personnel who are
Nevada residents must be determined by dividing the number of
workdays worked by Nevada residents by the number of workdays
worked by all below-the-line personnel.
(b) Any work performed by an extra must not be considered in
determining the percentage of the below-the-line personnel who are
Nevada residents.
[4.] 5. The Office may:
(a) Reduce the cumulative amount of noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits that are calculated pursuant to this section by
an amount equal to any damages incurred by the State or any
political subdivision of the State as a result of a qualified production
that is produced in this State; or
(b) Withhold the noninfrastructure transferable tax credits, in
whole or in part:
(1) Until any pending legal action in this State against a
production company or involving a qualified production is resolved.
(2) If a production company violates any state or local law.
(3) If a production company is found to have submitted any
false statement, representation or certification in any document
submitted for the purpose of obtaining noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits.
Sec. 22. NRS 360.7594 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7594 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
the Office of Economic Development shall not approve any
application for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits submitted
pursuant to NRS 360.759 if approval of the application would cause
-
*SB220*

– 28 –
the total amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
approved pursuant to NRS 360.759 for each [fiscal] :
(a) Fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 2025, and
before July 1, 2028, or on or after July 1, 2043, to exceed the sum
of $10,000,000. Any portion of the $10,000,000 per fiscal year for
which noninfrastructure transferable tax credits have not
previously been approved may be carried forward and made
available for approval during the next or any future fiscal year.
(b) Fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 2028, and
before July 1, 2043, to exceed the sum of $15,000,000. Any portion
of the $15,000,000 per fiscal year for which noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits have not previously been approved may be
carried forward and made available for approval during the next
or any future fiscal year.
2. The noninfrastructure transferable tax credits issued to any
production company for any qualified production pursuant to
NRS 360.759:
(a) Must not exceed a total amount of $6,000,000; and
(b) Expire [4] at the end of the calendar year that is 6 years
after the date on which the noninfrastructure transferable tax
credits are issued to the production company.
3. For the purposes of calculating qualified direct production
expenditures:
(a) The compensation payable to all producers who are Nevada
residents must not exceed 10 percent of the portion of the total
budget of the qualified production that was expended in or
attributable to any expenses incurred in this State.
(b) The compensation payable to all producers who are not
Nevada residents must not exceed 5 percent of the portion of the
total budget of the qualified production that was expended in or
attributable to any expenses incurred in this State.
(c) The compensation payable to any employee, independent
contractor or any other person who is below-the-line personnel and
who is paid a wage or salary as compensation for providing labor
services on the production of the qualified production must not
exceed $750,000.
Sec. 23. NRS 360.7595 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7595 1. If the Office of Economic Development receives
an application for noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
pursuant to NRS 360.759, the Office shall, not later than 10 days
before a hearing on the application, provide notice of the hearing to:
(a) The applicant;
(b) The Department; and
(c) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
-
*SB220*

– 29 –
2. The notice required by this section must set forth the date,
time and location of the hearing on the application. The date of the
hearing must be not later than 60 days after the Office receives the
completed application.
3. The Office shall issue a decision on the application not later
than 30 days after the conclusion of the hearing on the application.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if the
application is approved, principal photography of the qualified
production must begin not more than 90 days after the date on
which the decision on the application is issued. The Office of
Economic Development:
(a) Shall prescribe by regulation the procedure for determining
the date of commencement of qualified productions that do not
include photography for the purposes of this section.
(b) May extend by not more than 90 days the period otherwise
prescribed by this subsection.
5. A production company that produces a qualified production
shall submit the audit required by NRS 360.759 and all other
required information to the Office and the Department within the
time required by paragraph [(e)] (d) of subsection 3 of NRS
360.759. Production of the qualified production must be completed
within 18 months after the date of commencement of principal
photography. If the Office or the Department determines that
information submitted pursuant to this subsection is incomplete, the
production company shall, not later than 30 days after receiving
notice that the information is incomplete, provide to the Office or
the Department, as applicable, all additional information required by
the Office or the Department.
6. The Office shall give priority to the approval and processing
of an application relating to a qualified production that promotes
tourism in the State of Nevada.
Sec. 24. NRS 360.7598 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7598 The Office of Economic Development shall, on or
before October 1 of each year, prepare and submit to the Governor
and to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal
to the Legislature an annual report which includes, for the
immediately preceding fiscal year:
1. The number of applications submitted for noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits pursuant to NRS 360.759;
2. The number of qualified productions for which
noninfrastructure transferable tax credits were approved;
3. The amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
approved;
4. The amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
used;
-
*SB220*

– 30 –
5. The amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
transferred;
6. The amount of noninfrastructure transferable tax credits
taken against each allowable fee or tax, including the actual amount
used and outstanding, in total and for each qualified production;
7. The total amount of the qualified direct production
expenditures incurred by each qualified production and the portion
of those expenditures that were incurred in Nevada;
8. The number of persons in Nevada employed by each
qualified production , [and] the amount of wages paid to those
persons [;] and any demographic information concerning those
persons that has been voluntarily provided by those persons; and
9. The period during which each qualified production was in
Nevada and employed persons in Nevada.
Sec. 25. Chapter 231 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 26 to 32, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 26. As used in sections 26 to 32, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 27, 28 and 29 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 27. “Account” means the Account for Nevada Film,
Media and Related Technology Education and Vocational
Training created by section 30 of this act.
Sec. 28. “Board” means the Board for Nevada Film, Media
and Related Technology Education and Vocational Training
created by section 31 of this act.
Sec. 29. “Nevada Studios Project” has the meaning ascribed
to it in section 8 of this act.
Sec. 30. 1. The Account for Nevada Film, Media and
Related Technology Education and Vocational Training is hereby
created in the State General Fund. The Executive Director, at the
direction of the Board, shall administer the Account.
2. The Executive Director may apply for and accept gifts,
grants, bequests and donations from any source for deposit in the
Account.
3. The Account consists of:
(a) Money deposited for credit to the Account pursuant to NRS
360.759 and section 12 of this act.
(b) Any direct legislative appropriations to the Account.
(c) Any gifts, grants, bequests and donations made to the
Account.
(d) Interest and income earned on money in the Account.
-
*SB220*

– 31 –
4. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited
to the Account.
5. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of the
fiscal year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the
balance in the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal
year.
6. Money deposited in the Account pursuant to NRS 360.759
and section 12 of this act must be accounted for separately and
used by the Office to pay costs for the operation of the Nevada
Media and Technology Lab in the following order of priority:
(a) Base rent;
(b) The costs of employing an administrative officer for the
Nevada Media and Technology Lab, and any costs related to such
employment, in the amount of $300,000 per fiscal year;
(c) Any unpaid rent and interest on such unpaid rent at the
rate of 8 percent per year;
(d) Maintenance of a reserve in the amount of $1,000,000 for
the payment of base rent;
(e) Payment to the Video Game Publishing Design Program
Initiative of the University of Nevada, Las Vegas, in the amount of
$500,000 per fiscal year, or until a total of $2,500,000 is paid;
(f) Payment to the Creative Technology Initiative of the
University of Nevada, Las Vegas, in the amount of $1,000,000 per
fiscal year for 10 fiscal years, or until a total of $10,000,000 is
paid; and
(g) A reserve in the amount of $200,000 per fiscal year for the
replacement of shared equipment and furniture, fixtures and other
equipment.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, all money in
the Account must be used by the Office to make grants approved
by the Board to any institution within the Nevada System of
Higher Education, a state or local agency, a school district, a
vocational trade school, a nonprofit organization, a labor
organization or a private postsecondary educational institution
that provides a program of workforce development for the
production of qualified productions in this State. In addition to
being used for making grants pursuant to this subsection, money
transferred to the Account pursuant to NRS 360.759 and section
12 of this act may be used to pay costs associated to employ
personnel to assist with the operation of the Nevada Media and
Technology Lab.
8. If, on June 30, 2048, this section is scheduled to expire by
limitation on June 30, 2049, the unamortized balance of the
specialized tenant improvements within the Nevada Media and
-
*SB220*

– 32 –
Technology Lab must be paid to the owner of the building in
which the Nevada Media and Technology Lab is located, and such
money must be reserved to pay the costs described in paragraphs
(e), (f) and (g) of subsection 6 and to make grants pursuant to
subsection 7.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Nevada Media and Technology Lab” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 7 of this act.
(b) “Qualified production” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 360.7586.
Sec. 31. 1. There is hereby created the Board for Nevada
Film, Media and Related Technology Education and Vocational
Training within the Office of Economic Development in the Office
of the Governor, consisting of the following voting members:
(a) One member appointed by the Governor, from a nominee
selected by the lead participant for the Nevada Studios Project;
(b) One member appointed by the Governor, from a nominee
selected by the lead supplier for the Nevada Studios Project;
(c) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Majority Leader of the Senate;
(d) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Speaker of the Assembly;
(e) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Minority Leader of the Senate;
(f) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Minority Leader of the Assembly;
(g) One member appointed by the President of the University
of Nevada, Las Vegas, or the designee of the President;
(h) The Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development or his or her designee; and
(i) The Executive Director of the Governor’s Office of
Workforce Innovation or his or her designee.
2. In appointing members to the Board pursuant to
subsection 1, the appointing authorities set forth in that subsection
shall coordinate to ensure that both the public and private sectors
are represented on the Board.
3. The members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b),
(c), (e) and (g) of subsection 1 must be appointed to an initial term
of 4 years commencing on January 1, 2026, and the members
appointed pursuant to paragraphs (d) and (f) of subsection 1
must be appointed to an initial term of 2 years commencing on
January 1, 2026. After the initial terms, each member shall serve a
term of 4 years. Each appointed member serves at the pleasure of
the person appointing that member pursuant to subsection 1,
except for the member appointed pursuant to paragraph (a) of
-
*SB220*

– 33 –
subsection 1. If, for any reason, a vacancy occurs during the term
of an appointed member, the person who is responsible for making
the appointment pursuant to subsection 1 shall appoint a
replacement member qualified pursuant to that subsection to serve
for the remainder of the unexpired term. Except for the member
appointed pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1, each member
may serve not more than two consecutive full terms.
4. At the first meeting of each fiscal year, the Board shall
elect from among its members a Chair and a Vice Chair. The
Executive Director of the Office shall serve as the Secretary of the
Board.
5. A majority of the voting members of the Board constitutes
a quorum, and the affirmative vote of a majority of the voting
members of the Board is required to exercise any power conferred
on the Board.
6. The Board shall meet quarterly during the calendar years
2026, 2027 and 2028 and, thereafter, at least twice each calendar
year, but the Board may meet more often at the call of the Chair
or a majority of the voting members of the Board.
7. The members of the Board serve without compensation but
are entitled to receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses
provided for state officers and employees generally while engaged
in the official business of the Board.
8. A member of the Board who is an officer or employee of
this State or a political subdivision of this State must be relieved
from duties without loss of regular compensation so that the
officer or employee may prepare for and attend meetings of the
Board and perform any work necessary to carry out the duties of
the Board in the most timely manner practicable. A state agency or
political subdivision of this State shall not require an officer or
employee who is a member of the Board to make up the time the
officer or employee is absent from work to carry out duties as a
member of the Board or use annual vacation or compensatory
time for the absence.
Sec. 32. 1. The Board shall establish:
(a) The procedures for a person or entity to apply for a grant
of money from the Account;
(b) The criteria to be used to determine whether to approve an
application for a grant from the Account to an applicant; and
(c) The requirements for reports by recipients of grants from
the Account concerning the expenditures made from the grant, the
outcomes of the programs supported by the grant and any other
information deemed necessary by the Board.
-
*SB220*

– 34 –
2. The Executive Director may provide advice and
recommendations regarding the procedures, criteria and
requirements established by the Board pursuant to subsection 1.
3. The Office shall not make a grant of money from the
Account unless the Board has approved the application for the
grant.
4. A recipient of a grant must adopt and implement a
community benefits program, which must include, without
limitation:
(a) A commitment to workforce diversity, inclusiveness, access
and equality, including, without limitation, for underserved
communities, minority groups and veterans;
(b) An explanation of the actions that will be taken and
strategies that will be implemented to promote workforce diversity;
and
(c) The goals and performance measures which will be used to
measure the success of the program in achieving those goals.
Sec. 33. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 34. The Legislative Counsel shall:
1. In preparing the Nevada Revised Statutes, use the authority
set forth in subsection 10 of NRS 220.120 to substitute
appropriately the term “noninfrastructure transferable tax credits” in
NRS 360.758 to 360.7598, inclusive, for the term “transferable tax
credits” as previously used in those sections.
2. In preparing supplements to the Nevada Administrative
Code, substitute appropriately the term “noninfrastructure
transferable tax credits” in NAC 360.800 to 360.865, inclusive, for
the term “transferable tax credits” as previously used in those
sections.
Sec. 35. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025, and
expires by limitation on June 30, 2050.
H
-
*SB220*